Hawaii statutes.
[§659-4] Petition. The order is
obtained by petition addressed to a circuit court, setting out facts sufficient
to show a right to the order, and sworn to if the application is made by a
private individual, or is made by the attorney general as provided by section
659-6. [L 1876, c 39, §38; RL 1925, §2718; RL 1935, §4260; RL 1945, §10281; RL
1955, §236-21; HRS §659-48; am L 1972, c 90, §3(d); ren HRS §659-4]

Case Notes

Sufficiency of petition. 17 H. 9; 22 H. 385, 387.

Private individual is a proper party to apply for writ. 39
H. 431.

Appellant's petition sufficiently stated that appellant was a
resident, taxpayer, and qualified voter of Maui County, thus establishing
appellant's standing to bring petition. 74 H. 394, 846 P.2d 894 (1993).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next